Washington statutes.
RCW 19.77.900

Common law rights preserved prior to registration.

Nothing herein shall adversely affect the rights or the enforcement of rights in trademarks acquired in good faith at common law prior to registration under this chapter; however, during any period subsequent to July 23, 1989, when the registration of a mark under this chapter is in force and the registrant has not abandoned the trademark, no common law rights as against the registrant may be acquired.

[ 1989 c 72 s 12; 1955 c 211 s 16.]